hr-HR: Kompatibilni broj kapodastra od NIZ-a: 10 žica; 12 žica; 4 žice; 5 žica; 6 žica; 7 žica; 8 žica; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibelt capo-nummer for styrke: 10-strengs; 12-strengs; 4-strengs; 5-strengs; 6-strengs; 7-strengs; 8-strengs; Annet
da: Kompatibelt antal strenge for capoen: 10-strenget; 12-strenget; 4-strenget; 5-strenget; 6-strenget; 7-strenget; 8-strenget; Andet
th: จำนวนสายที่ใช้ได้กับคาโป: 10 สาย; 12 สาย; 4 สาย; 5 สาย; 6 สาย; 7 สาย; 8 สาย; อื่นๆ
it: Numero di capo compatibile della stringa: A 10 corde; A 12 corde; A 4 corde; A 5 corde; A 6 corde; A 7 corde; A 8 corde; Altro
cs: Kompatibilní kapodastr počet strun: 10strunný; 12strunný; 4strunný; 5strunný; 6strunný; 7strunný; 8strunný; Jiné
fr: Nombre de cordes compatible avec le capodastre: 10 cordes; 12 cordes; 4 cordes; 5 cordes; 6 cordes; 7 cordes; 8 cordes; Autre
el: Συμβατός αριθμός χορδών καποτάστο: 10 χορδών; 12 χορδών; 4 χορδών; 5 χορδών; 6 χορδών; 7 χορδών; 8 χορδών; Άλλο
de: Kompatible Capo-Nummer der Saite: 10-saitig; 12-saitig; 4-saitig; 5-saitig; 6-saitig; 7-saitig; 8-saitig; Sonstige
zh-CN: 变调夹适配琴弦数量: 10 弦; 12 弦; 4 弦; 5 弦; 6 弦; 7 弦; 8 弦; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný počet strún pre kapodaster: 10-strunový; 12-strunový; 4-strunový; 5-strunový; 6-strunový; 7-strunový; 8-strunový; Iné
ko: 호환 카포 현 수: 10현; 12현; 4현; 5현; 6현; 7현; 8현; 기타
zh-TW: 變調夾相容弦數: 10 弦; 12 弦; 4 弦; 5 弦; 6 弦; 7 弦; 8 弦; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas kapodasterio stygų skaičius: 10 stygų; 12 stygų; 4 stygų; 5 stygų; 6 stygų; 7 stygų; 8 stygų; Kita
ja: 互換性のあるストリングのカポ番号: 10弦; 12弦; 4弦; 5弦; 6弦; 7弦; 8弦; その他
pt-BR: Número de cordas compatível para capotraste: 10 cordas; 12 cordas; 4 cordas; 5 cordas; 6 cordas; 7 cordas; 8 cordas; Outro
ro-RO: Număr de corzi cu care este compatibil capodastrul: 10 corzi; 12 corzi; 4 corzi; 5 corzi; 6 corzi; 7 corzi; 8 corzi; Altele
sv: Kompatibelt antal strängar för en capo: 10-strängad; 12-strängad; 4-strängad; 5-strängad; 6-strängad; 7-strängad; 8-strängad; Annat
en: Compatible capo number of strings: 10-string; 12-string; 4-string; 5-string; 6-string; 7-string; 8-string; Other
ru: Совместимое количество струн для каподастра: 10-струнный; 12-струнный; 4-струнный; 5-струнный; 6-струнный; 7-струнный; 8-струнный; Другое
nl: Compatibel capo aantal snaren: 10-snarig; 12-snarig; 4-snarig; 5-snarig; 6-snarig; 7-snarig; 8-snarig; Overig
pl: Kompatybilna liczba strun kapodastra: 10-strunowy; 12-strunowy; 4-strunowy; 5-strunowy; 6-strunowy; 7-strunowy; 8-strunowy; Inne
es: Cantidad de cuerdas compatibles con el capotraste: 10 cuerdas; 12 cuerdas; 4 cuerdas; 5 cuerdas; 6 cuerdas; 7 cuerdas; 8 cuerdas; Otro
bg-BG: Съвместим брой струни за каподастъра: С 10 струни; С 12 струни; С 4 струни; С 5 струни; С 6 струни; С 7 струни; С 8 струни; Друго
fi: Capon yhteensopiva kielimäärä: 10-kielinen; 12-kielinen; 4-kielinen; 5-kielinen; 6-kielinen; 7-kielinen; 8-kielinen; Muu
sl-SI: Združljivo število strun za kapodaster: 10-strunski; 12-strunski; 4-strunski; 5-strunski; 6-strunski; 7-strunski; 8-strunski; Drugo
tr: Uyumlu kapo tel sayısı: 10 telli; 12 telli; 4 telli; 5 telli; 6 telli; 7 telli; 8 telli; Diğer
vi: Số dây đàn tương thích với capo: 10 dây; 12 dây; 4 dây; 5 dây; 6 dây; 7 dây; 8 dây; Khác
hu: Kompatibilis kápó húrok száma: 10 húros; 12 húros; 4 húros; 5 húros; 6 húros; 7 húros; 8 húros; Egyéb
pt-PT: Número capo compatível da cadeia: 10 cordas; 12 cordas; 4 cordas; 5 cordas; 6 cordas; 7 cordas; 8 cordas; Outro